Washington statutes.
RCW 42.20.100

Failure of duty by public officer a misdemeanor.

Whenever any duty is enjoined by law upon any public officer or other person holding any public trust or employment, their wilful neglect to perform such duty, except where otherwise specially provided for, shall be a misdemeanor.

[ 1909 c 249 s 16; RRS s 2268. Prior: Code 1881 s 889; 1854 p 90 s 82.]

NOTES:

Official misconduct by public servant: RCW 9A.80.010.